North Carolina, session 2025, HB259.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Program; Purpose. – The Department of Public Instruction shall
establish the Brown-Morgan Science Olympiad Grant Pilot Program (Program) for the
2025-2026 school year. The purpose of the Program is to improve the quality of science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education by providing students the
opportunity to compete in a rigorous academic interscholastic competition that consists of a series
of team events for which students prepare throughout the year.
SECTION 1.(b) Application. – The Department of Public Instruction shall make the
application for the Program available by August 1, 2025. All public school units are eligible to
apply. Public school units electing to apply shall submit applications no later than August 31,
2025.
SECTION 1.(c) Awards. – The Department of Public Instruction shall select and
notify grant recipients and disburse grant funds by September 15, 2025. The Department shall
prioritize awarding the full amount requested to public school units that did not have a Science
Olympiad team during the immediately preceding school year on a first come, first serve basis.
SECTION 1.(d) Use of Funds. – Grant funds received through the Program shall
supplement and not supplant any funds currently used for these purposes and may be used for
any of the following:
(1) Registration, tournament, or other similar type of fee required to participate in
a Science Olympiad event.
(2) Team project materials.
(3) Travel required to participate in a Science Olympiad event.
(4) Salary stipends to teachers that coach a Science Olympiad team.
SECTION 1.(e) Reporting. – No later than May 1, 2025, the Department of Public
Instruction shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee the following
information:
(1) The name of public school units participating in the Program.
(2) The number of students and the grade level of the students that participated in
Science Olympiad under the Program.
(3) The number of unfunded applications for the Program and the total dollar
amount requested but not funded.
(4) Any other information the Department deems relevant.
*H259-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars
($127,500) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Brown-Morgan Science
Olympiad Grant Pilot Program as established by this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 259-First Edition